Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1575.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin BIOFERTILIZER WATER PRESERVATION PROGRAM. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin For the purposes of this section, "commercial nitrogen fertilizer" means a fertilizer with a nitrogen content of no less than 25 percent. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Program established. new text end new text begin In consultation with the commissioner of natural resources and soil and water conservation districts in Minnesota, the commissioner of agriculture must develop and administer a biofertilizer water preservation pilot program to address water quality by incentivizing Minnesota farmers to improve nitrogen management and incorporate innovative technologies into the farmers' crop nutrient management plans. The commissioner must determine which products qualify for the program, including soil amendments, fertilizers with nitrogen fixing properties, biological sources of nitrogen, and other biofertilizers. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Payments to qualified farmers. new text end new text begin (a) In consultation with farmers and the fertilizer industry, the commissioner may establish a per acre payment rate, not less than $5 per acre, for payments provided to a qualifying farmer. The program may provide an annual per acre incentive payment to a qualifying farmer who verifies through documentation that the farmer has reduced commercial nitrogen fertilizer rates by using a qualifying product in the farmer's crop nutrient management plans by the lesser of: new text end new text begin (1) 15 percent; or new text end new text begin (2) 30 pounds per acre. new text end new text begin (b) The Department of Agriculture must annually review and may adjust the per acre payment rate based on inflation and emerging fertilizer technology. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Qualifications. new text end new text begin To qualify for the biofertilizer water preservation program, a farmer must: new text end new text begin (1) be a farmer in the state; and new text end new text begin (2) submit documentation to the commissioner, including a crop nutrient management plan that will reduce the use of commercial nitrogen fertilizers at the reduction rate required under subdivision 2 by using a qualifying product determined by the commissioner under subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Report required. new text end new text begin (a) By January 8, 2028, the commissioner must report on the program, including the following information: new text end new text begin (1) the program's required minimum commercial nitrogen fertilizer reduction rate under subdivision 3 and whether an increase in the minimum reduction rate is necessary; new text end new text begin (2) additional qualifying products that may be used by farmers in the program. When making this determination, the commissioner must consider newly available technologies and products capable of reducing commercial nitrogen fertilizer applications; new text end new text begin (3) the use of program funds, including the incentive payment rate made to farmers; new text end new text begin (4) the number of farmers and the number of acres in each county that receive an incentive payment; and new text end new text begin (5) an estimate of the amount of commercial nitrogen fertilizer reduced due to the program. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must submit the report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over agriculture policy and finance. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Data privacy. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 13.591, data submitted by a farmer to qualify for the program under subdivision 4 is classified as nonpublic data, as defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 13.02, subdivision 9, or private data on individuals, as defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 13.02, subdivision 12, but the data may be used to complete the report under subdivision 5, provided that the identity of a farmer must not be revealed or made ascertainable in the report. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $5,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of agriculture to establish and administer the biofertilizer water preservation program. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.28, any unencumbered balance at the end of fiscal year 2026 does not cancel and is available in fiscal year 2027. new text end